Hawaii statutes.
[§572D-3] Content. (a) Parties to a
premarital agreement may contract with respect to:

(1) The rights and obligations of each of the parties
in any of the property of either or both of them whenever and wherever acquired
or located;

(2) The right to buy, sell, use, transfer, exchange,
abandon, lease, consume, expend, assign, create a security interest in,
mortgage, encumber, dispose of, or otherwise manage and control property;

(3) The disposition of property upon separation,
marital dissolution, death, or the occurrence or nonoccurrence of any other
event;

(4) The modification or elimination of spousal
support;

(5) The making of a will, trust, or other arrangement
to carry out the provisions of the agreement;

(6) The ownership rights in and disposition of the
death benefit from a life insurance policy;

(7) The choice of law governing the construction of
the agreement; and

(8) Any other matter, including their personal rights
and obligations, not in violation of public policy or a statute imposing a
criminal penalty.

(b) The right of a child to support may not be
adversely affected by a premarital agreement. [L 1987, c 321, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next